North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 2. Voting.

§ 55-7-20.
Shareholders’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting. The list shall be arranged by voting group, by class or series of shares within each voting group, and shall show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder.

The shareholders’ list shall be available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning two business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, (i) at the corporation’s principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held or (ii) on a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to the list is provided with the notice of the meeting. In the event that the corporation determines to make the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that the information is available only to shareholders of the corporation. A shareholder, personally or by or with the shareholder’s representative, is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of

G.S. 55-16-02(c)

, to copy the list, during regular business hours and at the shareholder’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

If the meeting is to be held at a place, the corporation shall make the shareholders’ list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, personally or by or with the shareholder’s representative, is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment. If the meeting is to be held at a place, the corporation is not required to make the list available through electronic or other means of remote communication to a shareholder or proxy attending the meeting by remote communication pursuant to

G.S. 55-7-09

. If the meeting is to be held solely by means of remote communication, then the list shall also be open to inspection during the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network, and the information required to access the list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder or the shareholder’s representative to inspect the shareholders’ list before or at the meeting, or copy the list as permitted by subsection (b) [of this section], the superior court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or, if the corporation has no principal office in this State, the superior court of the county where the corporation’s registered office is located, on application of the shareholder, after notice is given to the corporation, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders’ list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 552, s. 9; 2001-387, s. 13; 2013-153, s. 6; 2021-162, s. 1(e).

§ 55-7-21.
Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders’ meeting.

Absent special circumstances, the shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned by or otherwise belong to the corporation, directly or indirectly, through an entity of which a majority of the voting power is held directly or indirectly by the corporation or which is otherwise controlled by the corporation.

Subsection (b) of this section does not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held, directly or indirectly, in a fiduciary capacity, unless they are held for the benefit of, or otherwise belong to, the corporation, directly or indirectly, through an entity of which a majority of the voting power is held directly or indirectly by the corporation or which is otherwise controlled by the corporation.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after notice of redemption is given to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

For purposes of this section, “voting power” means the current power to vote in the election of directors of a corporation or to elect, select, or appoint managers, managing members, or other members of the governing body of another entity.

History.

Rev., ss. 1183, 1184; 1907, c. 457, s. 1; 1909, c. 827, s. 1; C.S., s. 1173; 1945, c. 635; G.S., s. 55-110; 1951, c. 265, s. 2; 1953, c. 722; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 768; c. 1316, s. 23; 1963, c. 1065; 1969, c. 751, ss. 34, 35; 1985, c. 419; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 45; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2021-106, s. 1(a).

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Voting power of shares

Voting power of nonshareholders

Circular holdings

Redeemable Shares

Section 7.21(a) provides that each outstanding share, regardless of class or series, is entitled to one vote per share unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation. The articles of incorporation may provide for multiple or fractional votes per share and may provide that some classes or series of shares are nonvoting on some or all matters, or that some classes or series have a single vote per share or different multiple or fractional votes per share, or that some classes or series constitute one or more separate voting groups and are entitled to vote separately on the matter. To reflect the possibility that shares may have multiple or fractional votes per share, the provisions relating to quorums, voting, and similar matters in the Act are phrased in terms of votes represented by shares.

Under the last sentence of section 7.21(a), the power to vote may only be vested in shares. For example, bondholders may not be given the direct power to vote under the Act. They may, however, be given the power to vote by issuing them special classes or series of shares. See the Official Comment to section 7.22.

The purpose of the prohibition in section 7.21(b) is to prevent a board of directors or management from using a corporate investment to perpetuate itself in power. While shares acquired by a corporation cease to be outstanding under section 6.31, except as provided in that section, and therefore are not entitled to vote, other arrangements may be devised seeking to obtain the benefits of ownership without actually acquiring the shares at all or not acquiring the shares at the time the right to vote is determined. The concept of shares that “otherwise belong to” is included in addition to “owned by” to ensure that courts will have the flexibility to apply public policy considerations to arrangements under which shares are not technically “owned,” or under which shares may or will be owned at a later time, but which have a similar effect. For example, if the corporation or a controlled entity has entered into a forward purchase contract for shares with the right to vote or direct the vote of the shares, a court could find that the shares belong to the corporation and are not entitled to be voted under section 7.21. Similarly, if the voting power is exercised by someone acting on behalf of the corporation or by a member of management of the corporation, a court could find that the shares otherwise belong to the corporation, and are not entitled to vote under section 7.21. Section 7.21(c), however, makes the prohibition of section 7.21(b) against voting of shares inapplicable to shares held in a fiduciary capacity where the beneficiaries are persons other than the corporation directly or through an entity controlled by the corporation.

Redeemable shares are often redeemed in connection with a transaction such as a merger or the issuance of a new senior class or series of shares that requires shareholder approval. Section 7.21(d) avoids subjecting a transaction to approval by a class or series of redeemable shares that will be redeemed as a result of the transaction if adequate provision has been made to ensure that the holders of the redeemable shares will in fact receive the amount payable to them on redemption.

Revised North Carolina Commentary (2021)

The last sentence of subsection 7.21(a) of the Model Act, which specifies that only shares are entitled to vote, was omitted because

G.S. 55-7-21

.1 permits a corporation to provide to holders of debt securities the right to vote in certain circumstances.

§ 55-7-21.1.
Rights of holders of debt securities.

In addition to any rights otherwise lawfully conferred, the articles of incorporation of the corporation may confer upon the holders of any bonds, debentures or other debt obligations issued or to be issued by the corporation any one or more of the following powers and rights upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed in the articles of incorporation:

The power to vote on any matter either in conjunction with or to the full or partial exclusion of its shareholders, notwithstanding G.S. 55-6-01(c)(1), and in determination of votes and voting groups, the holders of such debt obligations shall be treated as shareholders;

The right to inspect the corporate books and records;

Any other rights concerning the corporation which its shareholders have or may have.

Any such power or right shall not be diminished, as to bonds, debentures or other obligations then outstanding, except by an amendment of the articles of incorporation approved by the vote or written consent of the holders of a majority in principal amount thereof or such larger percentage as may be specified in the articles of incorporation.

History.

1969, c. 751, s. 19; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.10; 1991, c. 645, s. 5.

North Carolina Commentary

This section, which does not appear in the Model Act, was added to bring forward the provisions of former G.S. 55-44.1(1), which enabled a corporation to confer upon the holders of debt securities the right to vote and to exercise other rights of shareholders in certain circumstances.

§ 55-7-22.
Proxies.

A shareholder may vote his shares in person or by proxy.

A shareholder may appoint one or more proxies to vote or otherwise act for the shareholder by signing an appointment form, either personally or by the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact. Without limiting G.S. 55-1- 50, an appointment in the form of an electronic record that bears the shareholder’s electronic signature and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by an automated process shall be deemed a valid appointment form within the meaning of this section. In addition, a public corporation may permit a shareholder may to appoint one or more proxies by any kind of telephonic transmission, even if not accompanied by written communication, under circumstances or together with information from which the corporation can reasonably assume that the appointment was made or authorized by the shareholder.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for 11 months unless a different period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the shareholder unless the appointment form conspicuously states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under

G.S. 55-7-31

.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises his authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (d) shall be revocable when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if he did not know of its existence when he acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to

G.S. 55-7-24

and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 24; 1973, c. 469, ss. 23-25; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1999-138, s. 1; 2001-387, s. 14.

§ 55-7-23.
Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as a shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

The procedure may set forth:

The types of nominees to which it applies;

The rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

The manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

The information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

The period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

Other aspects of the rights and duties created.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-7-24.
Corporation’s acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

The shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of its status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

Two or more persons are the shareholder as co-tenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the co-owners and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section or

G.S. 55-7-22(b)

are not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 42, 43; c. 474, ss. 1, 2; Rev., ss. 1185, 1186, 1187; C.S., s. 1174; G.S., s. 55-111; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1957, c. 1039; 1959, c. 1316, s. 36; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, ss. 4, 5.

§ 55-7-25.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of that voting group exists with respect to that matter, except that, in the absence of a quorum at the opening of any meeting of shareholders, such meeting may be adjourned from time to time by the vote of a majority of the votes cast on the motion to adjourn. Unless the articles of incorporation, a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, or this act provides otherwise, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter (other than the election of directors) by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation, a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, or this Chapter requires a greater number of affirmative votes.

An amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws adding, changing, or deleting a quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (a) or (c) is governed by

G.S. 55-7-27

.

The election of directors is governed by

G.S. 55-7-28

.

Whenever a provision of this Chapter provides for voting by one or more series as separate voting groups, unless otherwise provided in this Chapter, the requirement provided in G.S. 55-10-04(c) for amendments of articles of incorporation apply to that provision.

History.

1901, c. 2, s. 39; Rev., s. 1182; C.S., s. 1175; 1927, c. 138; G.S., s. 55-112; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1973, c. 469, ss. 21, 22; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1991, c. 645, s. 16(a); 2018-45, s. 4.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 7.25 establishes general quorum and voting requirements for voting groups for purposes of the Act. As defined in section 1.40, a “voting group” consists of all shares of one or more classes or series that under the articles of incorporation or the Act are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter. Shares entitled to vote “generally” on a matter (that is, all shares entitled to vote on the matter by the articles of incorporation or the Act that do not expressly have the right to be counted separately) are a single voting group. On most matters coming before shareholders’ meetings, only a single voting group, consisting of a class of voting shares, will be involved, and action on such a matter is effective when approved by that voting group pursuant to section 7.25. See section 7.26(a).

Section 7.25 covers quorum and voting requirements for all actions by the shareholders of a corporation with a single class of voting shares. It also covers quorum and voting requirements for a matter on which only a class or series of shares is entitled to vote under the articles of incorporation, for example, when a class with preferential rights may vote to elect directors because of a default in the payment of dividends (a vote which is often described as a “class vote”). Finally, section 7.25 also covers quorum and voting requirements for a matter on which both common and preferred shares or separate classes or series of common or preferred shares are entitled to vote, either together as a single voting group under the articles of incorporation or separately as two or more voting groups under either the articles of incorporation or the Act. See section 7.26(b).

Determination of Voting Groups under the Act

Quorum and Voting Requirements in General

Quorum Requirements for Action by Voting Group

Voting Requirements for Approval by Voting Group

Modification of Standard Requirements

Under the Act, classes or series of shares are generally not entitled to vote separately by voting group except to the extent specifically authorized by the articles of incorporation. But sections 9.21, 9.32, 10.04, and 11.04 of the Act grant classes or series of shares the right to vote separately when fundamental changes are proposed that may adversely affect that class or series. Section 10.04(c) further provides that when two or more classes or series are affected by an amendment covered by section 10.04 in essentially the same way, the classes or series are grouped together and must vote as a single voting group rather than as multiple voting groups on the matter, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or required by the board of directors. Section 7.25(f) provides that the group voting rule of section 10.04(c), including the ability to vary that rule in the articles of incorporation or by action of the board of directors, also applies to the group voting provisions in sections 9.21, 9.32, and 11.04. Under the Act even a class or series of shares that is expressly described as nonvoting under the articles of incorporation may be entitled to vote separately on an amendment to the articles of incorporation that affects the class or series in a designated way. See section 10.04(d).

In addition to the provisions of the Act, separate voting by voting group may be authorized by the articles of incorporation (except that the statutory privilege of voting by separate voting groups cannot be diluted or reduced). On some matters, the board of directors may condition its submission of matters to shareholders on their approval by specific voting groups designated by the board of directors. Sections 7.25 and 7.26 establish the mechanics by which all voting by single or multiple voting groups is carried out.

In some situations, shares of a single class or series may be entitled to vote in two different voting groups. See the Official Comment to section 7.26.

A corporation’s determination of the voting groups entitled to vote, and the quorum and voting requirements applicable to that determination, should be determined separately for each matter coming before a meeting. As a result, different quorum and voting requirements may be applicable to different portions of a meeting, depending on the matter being considered. In the normal case where only a single voting group is entitled to vote on all matters coming before a meeting of shareholders, a single quorum and voting requirement will usually be applicable to the entire meeting. To reflect the possibility that shares may have multiple or fractional votes per share, the provisions relating to quorums are phrased in terms of votes represented by shares.

Under section 7.25(b), once a share is present at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes throughout the meeting. Thus, a voting group may continue to act despite the withdrawal of persons having the power to vote one or more shares.

The shares owned by a shareholder who comes to the meeting to object on grounds of lack of notice are considered present for purposes of determining the presence of a quorum. Similarly, shares owned by a shareholder who attends a meeting solely for purposes of raising the objection that a quorum is not present are considered present for purposes of determining the presence of a quorum. Attendance at a meeting, however, does not constitute a waiver of other objections to the meeting such as the lack of notice. Such waivers are governed by section 7.06(b).

If a new record date is set, new notice must be given to holders of shares of a voting group and a quorum must be established from within the holders of shares of that voting group as of the new record date.

Section 7.25(c) provides that an action (other than the election of directors, which is governed by section 7.28) is approved by a voting group at a meeting at which a quorum is present if the votes cast in favor of the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation require a greater number of votes. This default rule differs from a formulation appearing in some state statutes that an action is approved at a meeting at which a quorum is present if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares represented at that meeting. That formulation in effect treats abstentions as negative votes; the Act treats them truly as abstentions. For example, if a corporation (that has not, through the articles of incorporation, modified quorum and voting requirements) has 1,000 shares of a single class outstanding, each share entitled to cast one vote, a quorum consists of 501 shares; if 600 shares are represented at the meeting and the vote on a proposed action is 280 in favor, 225 opposed, and 95 abstaining, the action would not be approved in a state following the formulation that treats abstentions as negative votes because fewer than a majority of the 600 shares attending voted in favor of the action. Under section 7.25(c) the action would be approved and not be defeated by the 95 abstaining votes.

The articles of incorporation may modify the quorum and voting requirements of section 7.25 for a single voting group or for all voting groups entitled to vote on any matter. The articles of incorporation may increase the quorum and voting requirements to any extent desired up to and including unanimity, subject to section 7.27. They may also require that shares of different classes or series are entitled to vote separately or together on specific issues or provide that actions are approved only if they receive the favorable vote of a majority of the shares of a voting group present at a meeting at which a quorum is present. The articles may also decrease the quorum requirement as desired, subject to section 7.25(a) and section 7.27.

North Carolina Commentary

The Model Act was modified in subsection (a) to bring forward the provisions of former G.S. 55-65(d), which permitted adjournment of a meeting in the absence of a quorum until a quorum is present. Subsections (a), (c) and (d) were modified to provide that special quorum and voting requirements can be established by a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, as well as by the articles of incorporation or the provisions of this Act.

§ 55-7-26.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation, a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, or this Chapter provides for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in

G.S. 55-7-25

.

If the articles of incorporation, a bylaw adopted by the shareholders, or this Chapter provides for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in

G.S. 55-7-25

. Action may be taken by one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken at the same time by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-7-27.
Greater quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation or a bylaw adopted by the shareholders may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of shareholders) than is provided for by this Chapter. Any such bylaw adopted by the shareholders after the effective date of this section must be approved by a quorum and vote sufficient to amend the articles of incorporation for that purpose.

Any provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribing the quorum or vote required for any purpose as permitted by this section may not itself be amended by a quorum or vote less than the quorum or vote therein prescribed.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, ss. 2, 3; 1973, c. 469, ss. 4, 22; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-7-28.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or in an agreement valid under

G.S. 55-7-31

, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “[all] [a designated voting group of ] shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors” (or words of similar import) means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

Shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

A shareholder or proxy who has the right to cumulate his votes announces in open meeting, before voting for directors starts, his intention to vote cumulatively; and if such announcement is made, the chair shall declare that all shares entitled to vote have the right to vote cumulatively and shall announce the number of votes represented in person and by proxy, and shall thereupon grant a recess of not less than one hour nor more than four hours, as he shall determine, or of such other period of time as is unanimously then agreed upon.

Shareholders of a corporation incorporated in this State shall have the right to cumulate their votes for directors if

The corporation was in existence prior to July 1, 1957, under a charter which does not grant the right of cumulative voting and at the time of the election the stock transfer book of such corporation discloses, or it otherwise appears, that there is at least one stockholder who owns or controls more than one-fourth of the voting stock of such corporation (shares represented at a meeting by revocable proxy relating to that meeting or adjourned meetings thereof shall not be deemed shares “controlled” within the meaning of this subsection), or if

The corporation was incorporated on or after July 1, 1957, and before July 1, 1990,

unless, when the stock transfer books are closed or at the record date fixed to determine the shareholders entitled to receive notice of and to vote at the meeting of shareholders, the corporation is a public corporation as defined in G.S. 55-1-40(18a). This right to vote cumulatively may be denied or limited by amendment to the articles of incorporation, but no such amendment shall be made when the number of shares voting against the amendment would be sufficient to elect a director by cumulative voting if such shares are entitled to be voted cumulatively for the election of directors.

History.

Rev., ss. 1183, 1184; 1907, c. 457, s. 1; 1909, c. 827, s. 1; C.S., s. 1173; 1945, c. 635; G.S., s. 55-110; 1951, c. 265, s. 2; 1953, c. 722; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 768; c. 1316, s. 23; 1963, c. 1065; 1969, c. 751, ss. 34, 35; 1985, c. 419; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 45; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.11; 1991, c. 645, ss. 16(b), 19.

§ 55-7-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.